Utah statutes.
58-56-6.   Building codes -- Division duties and responsibilities.
(1)  The division shall administer the codes adopted or approved under Section
58-56-4 pursuant to this chapter, but has no responsibility or duty to conduct
inspections to determine compliance with the codes, issue permits, or assess
building permit fees.
(2)  Administration of the codes adopted or approved under Section 58-56-4 by
the division shall include:
(a)   scheduling appropriate hearings;
(b)  maintaining, publishing for reference, and keeping the current adopted
code, excluding the fire code, and approved code; and
(c)  publishing the opinions of the commission with respect to interpretation
and application of the codes.
